Utah statutes.
78B-17-201.   Issuance of subpoena.
(1) (a)  To request issuance of a subpoena under this section, a party must
submit a foreign subpoena to a court in the judicial district in which
discovery is sought to be conducted in Utah.
(b)  A request for the issuance of a subpoena under this chapter does not
constitute an appearance in the courts of this state.
(2)  When a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in Utah, the
clerk, in accordance with that court's procedure, shall promptly issue a
subpoena for service upon the person to whom the foreign subpoena is directed.
(3)  A subpoena under Subsection (2) must:
(a)  incorporate the terms used in the foreign subpoena; and
(b)  contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses, and telephone numbers
of all counsel of record in the proceeding to which the subpoena relates and
of any party not represented by counsel.
